Utah statutes.
19-4-108.   Supplier -- Variance or exemption -- Failure to comply --
Violation of chapter -- Public notice.
When a supplier has a variance or exemption granted, has failed to comply with
the terms of a variance or exemption, or has been finally determined to have
committed a violation of this chapter, the supplier shall provide public
notice of that fact as provided by the rules of the board.
